Utah statutes.
32B-2-501.   Commission's power to establish a state store.

(1)  The commission may establish state stores in the numbers and at places, owned or leased by the department, that the commission considers proper for the sale of liquor by employees of the state, in accordance with this title and the rules made under this title.

(2)  The commission may not establish a total number of state stores that at any time exceeds the number determined by dividing the population of the state by 48,000.

(3)  The commission may not establish a state store at premises that do not meet the proximity requirements of Section 32B-1-202.

(4)  An employee of a state store is considered a department employee and shall meet the qualification requirements for employment in Sections 32B-1-303 and 32B-2-207.

(5) (a)  The commission shall ensure that signage installed or replaced at or near a state store, on or after May 11, 2010, complies with Subsection (5)(b) if the signage is:

(i)  attached to the exterior of the premises of a state store; or

(ii)  not attached to the premises of a state store, but otherwise alerts or directs a person to the location of a state store.

(b)  Signage described in Subsection (5)(a) shall contain the following words in the size of lettering required by Subsection (5)(c):

(i)  "state"; or

(ii)  "State of Utah."

(c)  The text described in Subsection (5)(b) shall be in lettering that is equal to or larger than the size of any text on the same signage that refers to "liquor" or "wine."



Amended by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

